Illinois, session 104th, SB2247.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Micromobility Fire Safety Act. 6    Section 5. Findings.7    (a) Micromobility devices, such as electric bicycles, 8electric scooters, and personal e-mobility devices, like 9hoverboards and electric unicycles, are increasingly popular, 10battery-powered transportation options for American consumers 11and workers.12    (b) As battery-powered devices, micromobility devices can 13be a fire and explosion safety hazard if they do not meet 14safety standards.15    (c) For micromobility devices that do not meet safety 16standards, there is a heightened risk of the lithium-ion 17batteries that power these devices experiencing a cascading 18failure where the overwhelming generation of heat triggers the 19release of toxic gases, explosions, or the spread of flames.20    (d) In 2021 and 2022, the U.S. Consumer Product Safety 21Commission received reports from 39 states of at least 208 22fires or overheating events that were associated with electric 23bicycles and personal e-mobility devices that caused 19   SB2247 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07607 SPS 17651 b1fatalities.2    (e) There are consensus standards available that mitigate 3the battery and electrical system hazards of electric bicycles 4and personal e-mobility devices that can cause fires.5    (f) In 2022, the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission 6issued a letter to the manufacturers, importers, distributors, 7and retailers of electric bicycles and personal e-mobility 8devices urging these products to be "designed, manufactured, 9and certified" to the appropriate UL standard as 10"manufacturing these products in compliance with the 11applicable UL standards significantly reduces the risk of 12injuries and deaths from micromobility device fires."13    (g) In 2023, after 216 micromobility device-related fires 14in 2022 that caused 147 injuries and 6 fatalities, New York 15City enacted legislation requiring micromobility device and 16battery certification to the applicable UL safety standards by 17an ISO-accredited laboratory. 18    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:19    "Accredited testing laboratory" means an independent 20third-party organization providing certification and testing 21for micromobility products, including low-speed electric 22bicycles and personal e-mobility devices, that has received 23ISO/IEC 17065 or ISO/IEC 17025 accreditation from an 24independent accreditation body that is a member of the 25International Accreditation Forum.  SB2247 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07607 SPS 17651 b1    "Electric personal assistive mobility device" has the 2meaning set forth in Section 1-117.7 of the Illinois Vehicle 3Code.4    "Lithium-ion battery" or "cell" means a rechargeable 5electrochemical cell or battery in which the positive and 6negative electrodes are both lithium compounds constructed 7with no metallic lithium in either electrode. "Lithium-ion 8battery" or "cell" includes a lithium-ion polymer battery or 9cell that uses lithium-ion chemistries.10    "Low-speed electric scooter" has the meaning set forth in 11Section 1-140.11 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.12    "Moped" has the meaning set forth in Section 1-148.2 of 13the Illinois Vehicle Code.14    "Motor-driven cycle" has the meaning set forth in Section 151-145.001 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.16    "Off-highway motorcycle" has the meaning set forth in 17Section 1-153.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.18    "Personal e-mobility device" means a consumer mobility 19device, other than a low-speed electric bicycle, intended for 20a single rider with a traction battery and electric motor or 21drive train that propels the device, which may be 22self-balancing and may be provided with a handle for grasping 23while riding, a seat for the rider, or operable pedals. 24"Personal e-mobility device" includes an electric personal 25assistive mobility device and low-speed electric scooter. 26"Personal e-mobility device" also includes a skateboard,   SB2247 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07607 SPS 17651 b1motor-driven cycle, moped, and off-highway motorcycle, if 2those vehicles are propelled by an electric motor.3    "Recycling" means any process by which materials that 4would otherwise become waste are collected, separated, or 5processed for the purpose of returning the materials to the 6economic mainstream in the form of raw materials for new 7products.8    "Traction battery" means a rechargeable lithium-ion 9battery used to power the electric drive motor of a low-speed 10electric bicycles or personal e-mobility devices. 11    Section 15. Manufacture and distribution of low-speed 12electric bicycles, personal e-mobility devices, and traction 13batteries.14    (a) No person shall manufacture, distribute, sell, lease, 15rent, offer for sale, offer for lease, or offer for rent a 16low-speed electric bicycle unless the electrical drive system 17for the low-speed electric bicycle has been tested by an 18accredited testing laboratory and found: (i) before January 1, 192028, to comply with ANSI/CAN/UL Standard 2849 or EN Standard 2015194; or (ii) on or after January 1, 2028, to comply with 21ANSI/CAN/UL Standard 2849.22    (b) No person shall manufacture, distribute, sell, lease, 23rent, offer for sale, offer for lease, offer for rent, or 24operate in furtherance of a business activity a personal 25e-mobility device unless the electrical system for the   SB2247 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07607 SPS 17651 b1personal e-mobility device has been tested by an accredited 2testing laboratory and found to comply with ANSI/CAN/UL 3Standard 2272.4    (c) No person shall manufacture, distribute, sell, lease, 5rent, offer for sale, offer for lease, or offer for rent a 6traction battery for a low-speed electric bicycle unless the 7traction battery has been tested by an accredited testing 8laboratory and found: (i) before January 1, 2028, to comply 9with ANSI/CAN/UL Standard 2271, ANSI/CAN/UL Standard 2849, or 10EN Standard 15194; or (ii) on or after January 1, 2028, to 11comply with ANSI/CAN/UL Standard 2271 or ANSI/CAN/UL Standard 122849.13    (d) No person shall manufacture, distribute, sell, lease, 14rent, offer for sale, offer for lease, or offer for rent a 15traction battery for a personal e-mobility device unless the 16traction battery has been tested by an accredited testing 17laboratory and found to comply with ANSI/CAN/UL Standard 2271. 18    Section 20. Reconditioned traction batteries.19    (a) It is unlawful for any person to:20        (1) assemble or recondition a traction battery using 21    cells removed from used lithium-ion batteries; or22        (2) sell or offer for sale a lithium-ion traction 23    battery that uses cells removed from used lithium-ion 24    batteries.25    (b) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit   SB2247 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07607 SPS 17651 b1the recycling of traction batteries or their components. 2    Section 25. Enforcement by Attorney General. A violation 3of any of the provisions of this Act is an unlawful practice 4under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. 5All remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Attorney 6General by that Act shall be available to the Attorney General 7for the enforcement of this Act. 8    Section 90. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 9Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 10    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)11    Sec. 2HHHH. Violations of the Micromobility Fire Safety 12Act. A person who violates the Micromobility Fire Safety Act 13commits an unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 151, 2026.